Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB303.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *(77) The sale at retail to or use by a construction contractor of building materials, supplies and services thereto 123456789101112131415161718192021 that are used for construction, reconstruction, remodeling, repairing and maintenance of affordable housing projects. As used in this paragraph, the term "affordable housing" is as defined in section 1902-A.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0303PN0256 - 2 - 12345